Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1306XS (3) 91 lh/ko S.F. 133 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 8H.1 Provision of period products. 1 1. The entity with authority over a state building shall 2 ensure that period products are available, at no cost, in the 3 restrooms of the state building. 4 2. For the purpose of this section: 5 a. âPeriod productsâ means tampons and period pads for use 6 in connection with the menstrual cycle. 7 b. âState agencyâ means a unit of state government, which 8 is an authority, board, commission, committee, council, 9 department, or independent agency as defined in section 7E.4, 10 including but not limited to each principal central department 11 enumerated in section 7E.5. However, âstate agencyâ does not 12 mean any of the following: 13 (1) The office of the governor or the office of an elective 14 constitutional or statutory officer. 15 (2) The general assembly, or any office or unit under its 16 administrative authority. 17 (3) The judicial branch, as provided in section 602.1102. 18 (4) A political subdivision of the state or its offices or 19 units, including but not limited to a county or city, but not 20 including a community college. 21 c. âState buildingâ means a public facility or building 22 owned, leased, or operated by or under the control of the 23 state government, a state agency, the state department of 24 transportation, the state board of regents, or the Iowa state 25 fair board. 26 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 218.101 Provision of period products. 27 Institutions controlled by the director of health and 28 human services under section 218.1 shall make period products 29 available, at no cost, to residents or patients of the 30 institutions in locations and as appropriate to the health 31 care needs of the residents or patients, and to staff and the 32 public, in the restrooms of the institutions. As used in this 33 section, âperiod productsâ means tampons and period pads for use 34 in connection with the menstrual cycle. 35 -1- LSB 1306XS (3) 91 lh/ko 1/ 3 S.F. 133 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 256.98A Provision of period products. 1 The superintendent of the Iowa school for the deaf shall make 2 period products available, at no cost, to students, staff, and 3 the public in the restrooms of school buildings and of each 4 campus building frequented by students, staff, and the public. 5 As used in this section, âperiod productsâ means tampons and 6 period pads for use in connection with the menstrual cycle. 7 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 280.36 Provision of period products. 8 1. The board of directors of each public school district and 9 the authorities in charge of each nonpublic school shall ensure 10 that period products are available, at no cost, to students, 11 staff, and the public in the restrooms of school buildings. 12 2. For the purposes of this section: 13 a. âPeriod productsâ means tampons and period pads for use 14 in connection with the menstrual cycle. 15 b. âSchool buildingâ means any facility that is owned or 16 leased by a public school district or nonpublic school over 17 which the board or authorities have care, custody, and control. 18 3. Subject to funding appropriated for this purpose, the 19 department of education shall reimburse each public school 20 for the reasonable cost of the public school providing period 21 products pursuant to subsection 1. 22 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 904.517 Provision of period products. 23 The department shall ensure that period products are 24 available to offenders committed to the institutions specified 25 in section 904.102 at no cost and in a quantity and as 26 appropriate to the health care needs of the individual 27 offender. The department shall also ensure that period 28 products are available, at no cost, to staff and the public in 29 the restrooms of the institutions. For the purposes of this 30 section, âperiod productsâ means tampons and period pads for use 31 in connection with the menstrual cycle. 32